Florida, session 2026, SB514.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 108 109 Section 1.âSection 383.295, Florida Statutes, is created to 110 read: 111 383.295âDoulas.â 112 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 113 (a)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Health. 114 (b)ââDoulaâ means a nonmedical professional who provides 115 health education, advocacy, and physical, emotional, and 116 nonmedical support for pregnant and postpartum women before, 117 during, and after childbirth, including support during 118 miscarriage and stillbirth. Doulas are not clinical providers 119 and are not licensed. 120 (c)ââDoula servicesâ means the provision of physical, 121 emotional, and informational support by a nonmedical 122 professional to a pregnant woman during the prenatal, 123 intrapartum, and postpartum periods. Activities may include 124 childbirth education, labor support, postpartum recovery 125 support, assistance with infant care, lactation support, and 126 connection to community resources. 127 (d)ââEvidence-basedâ means a process in which decisions are 128 made and actions or activities are carried out, based on the 129 best evidence available, with the goal of removing subjective 130 opinion, unfounded beliefs, or bias from decisions and actions. 131 Such evidence may include practitioner experience and expertise 132 as well as feedback from other practitioners and beneficiaries. 133 (2)âPILOT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED.â 134 (a)âThe Doula Support for Healthy Births pilot program is 135 established in Broward, Miami-Dade, and Palm Beach Counties to 136 integrate doula services into existing maternal health 137 initiatives, targeting pregnant and postpartum women who have 138 overcome or are overcoming substance use disorders. 139 (b)âThe purpose of the pilot program is to improve birth 140 outcomes by decreasing preterm birth rates and cesarean 141 deliveries, enhancing access to care, and supporting maternal 142 well-being throughout the pregnancy, labor, and postpartum 143 periods using evidence-based methods. 144 (c)âThe Department of Health, through its maternal and 145 child health section, shall implement and oversee the pilot 146 program. 147 (3)âPROGRAM STRUCTURE.â 148 (a)âThe pilot program may operate for 12 to 24 months, 149 subject to funding. 150 (b)âThe pilot program shall target the enrollment of 151 pregnant and postpartum women who have overcome or are 152 overcoming substance use disorders. 153 (c)âThe following support services must be offered under 154 the pilot program: 155 1.âPrenatal support, such as educational resources, 156 personalized birth plans, and emotional support. 157 2.âLabor support, such as continuous emotional support, 158 comfort measures, and communication facilitation. 159 3.âPostpartum support, such as assistance with newborn 160 care, postpartum resources, and household tasks. 161 4.âAdvocacy support, such as assistance with preferences 162 and needs within medical settings and health care navigation. 163 5.âComprehensive emotional support during the pregnancy and 164 postpartum periods. 165 (4)âCOLLABORATION; INTEGRATION.â 166 (a)âThe department shall collaborate with: 167 1.âHealth care providers, community organizations, 168 community coalitions, and advocacy groups to integrate doulas 169 and doula services into existing maternal health programs, 170 ensuring that such doulas are trained and meet all of the 171 following criteria: 172 a.âDemonstrate a strong understanding of the reproductive 173 system, labor process, and postpartum recovery. 174 b.âAre proficient in hands-on techniques, such as massage, 175 counterpressure, breathing exercises, and nonmedicated pain 176 management. 177 c.âSupport a clientâs birth plan, communicate effectively 178 with medical staff, and advocate for informed consent. 179 d.âProvide guidance on breastfeeding, basic newborn care, 180 and both the physical and emotional aspects of postpartum 181 recovery. 182 e.âUse active listening, clear communication, and conflict 183 resolution skills in interactions with clients and health care 184 providers. 185 f.âUnderstand common medical complications and provide 186 emotional and physical support to clients in challenging 187 situations. 188 g.âUphold professionalism, ethical decisionmaking, and 189 legal responsibilities in doula practice. 190 2.âLocal WIC programs, hospitals, birth centers, and 191 community health centers to facilitate outreach and service 192 delivery. 193 (b)âThe department may integrate doula services into 194 existing maternal and child health programs as an expansion of 195 the pilot program, focusing on pregnant and postpartum women who 196 have overcome or are overcoming substance use disorders. Any 197 such expansion of the pilot program must include annual 198 reporting requirements for the department to evaluate 199 effectiveness, equity, and quality of integrating doula services 200 into the existing maternal and child health programs. 201 (5)âFUNDING.âThe pilot program shall be funded using 202 appropriations for the Closing the Gap grant program established 203 under ss. 381.7351-381.7356. The department shall coordinate 204 with its Division of Community Health Promotion and Office of 205 Minority Health and Health Equity to seek additional federal 206 funds to support implementation. 207 Section 2.âDoula Certification Task Force.â 208 (1)âESTABLISHMENT.âThere is created within the Department 209 of Health the Doula Certification Task Force, a task force as 210 defined in s. 20.03(5), Florida Statutes, for the purpose of 211 reviewing the scope of doula services and ensuring competency, 212 quality, and consistency in the delivery of doula services to 213 pregnant and postpartum women. 214 (2)âOVERSIGHT.âThe Department of Health shall oversee and 215 provide administrative support to the task force. 216 (3)âMEMBERSHIP; MEETINGS.â 217 (a)âThe task force shall be composed of nine members. Three 218 members shall be appointed by the Governor, three members shall 219 be appointed by the Senate President, and three members shall be 220 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. Of the 221 nine members, two members must be health care practitioners as 222 defined in s. 456.001, Florida Statutes, experienced in caring 223 for pregnant or postpartum women, and at least one member must 224 be a doula or otherwise have experience providing nonmedical 225 support services to pregnant or postpartum women. A vacancy on 226 the task force must be filled in the same manner as the original 227 appointment. The task force shall elect a chair from among its 228 members. 229 (b)âThe task force shall meet as often as necessary to 230 complete its work, but at least quarterly, at the call of the 231 chair. The task force may conduct its meetings through 232 teleconference or other similar electronic means. 233 (4)âDUTIES.âThe task force shall do all of the following: 234 (a)âReview the scope of practice for doulas in this state, 235 as well as in other states. 236 (b)âEstablish core competencies for the provision of doula 237 services. 238 (c)âRecommend minimum certification standards for doulas, 239 which must include, but need not be limited to, all of the 240 following: 241 1.âPossession of a high school diploma or its equivalent. 242 2.âCompletion of a department-approved, evidence-based 243 training program. 244 3.âA minimum number of supervised practice hours. 245 4.âCompletion of a background screening. 246 5.âEducation in professional ethics. 247 (5)âREPORT.âBy January 1, 2028, the task force shall submit 248 a final report of its findings and recommendations to the 249 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 250 House of Representatives. 251 (6)âSUNSET.âThe task force shall operate on a temporary 252 basis in conjunction with the Doula Support for Healthy Births 253 pilot program established under s. 383.295, Florida Statutes, as 254 created by this act, and shall expire on October 2, 2029, in 255 accordance with s. 20.052(8), Florida Statutes. 256 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.